Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 27-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 27-103. A public school or school district shall not be
a member of any school athletic association unless that association
has adopted a written policy that requires the following:
1. All records of the association to be made accessible
consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;
2. All meetings of the association to be open and conducted in
a manner consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting
Act, including specifically the notice and agenda, voting, and
executive session requirements. All hearings of the association
including, but not limited to, hearings for rule violations,
eligibility determinations, and requests for hardship waivers shall
be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act; and

3. An annual financial audit and a compliance audit of all
funds of the association in accordance with the auditing standards
set forth in the Oklahoma Public School Audit Law. In addition, the
association shall have performance audits conducted of the
operations of the association. A performance audit shall be
conducted no later than December 31, 2014, and by December 31 every
five (5) years thereafter.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 8-103.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2153 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2153 Page 3